Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-1415
Disclosure of juror's vote or opinion; prohibited.

No grand juror shall be allowed to state or testify in any court in what manner he or other members of the grand jury voted on any question before them, or what opinion was expressed by any juror in relation to such question.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 407, p. 815;

R.S.1913, § 9045;

C.S.1922, § 10069;

C.S.1929, § 29-1415;

R.S.1943, § 29-1415.